Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1935
Act; violation; penalty.

Except as provided in section 81-1932, any person who violates the provisions of sections 81-1901 to 81-1936 or who falsely states or represents that he or she is or has been an examiner or intern shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 35.